Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.060

Officers, employees or agents of school districts or educational service districts, insurance to protect and hold personally harmless.

Any school district board of directors and educational service district board are authorized to purchase insurance to protect and hold personally harmless any director, officer, employee or agent of the respective school district or educational service district from any action, claim or proceeding instituted against him or her arising out of the performance or failure of performance of duties for or employment with such institution and to hold him or her harmless from any expenses connected with the defense, settlement or monetary judgments from such actions.

[ 1990 c 33 s 330; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 116; 1972 ex.s. c 142 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.630.]